Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 10 Absentee Voting

Cross references.

Penalty for voting by absentee ballot without qualifying to vote in such manner, §

21-2-573

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Absentee Voting, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Election Board, Georgia Election Code, Subject 183-1-14.

Law reviews.

For note, “Election Spotlight: Nearly Twenty Years After Hanging Chads, Problems Persist in Florida,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 895 (2020).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-380.
“Absentee elector” defined; when reason for absentee ballot not required.

As used in this article, the term “absentee elector” means an elector of this state or a municipality thereof who casts a ballot in a primary, election, or runoff other than in person at the polls on the day of such primary, election, or runoff.

An elector who votes by absentee ballot shall not be required to provide a reason in order to cast an absentee ballot in any primary, election, or runoff.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1401, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 15; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 17a; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 61, § 9; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1084, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 35; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 50/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 448, § 1/SB 387; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 17/HB 540.

Cross references.

Right of persons hospitalized for mental illness, mental retardation, alcoholism, or other disabilities to vote by absentee ballot, §§

37-3-144

,

37-4-104

and

37-7-144

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Absentee ballot envelope; definition of advanced age; use of symbols, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.01.

21-2-380.1.
Appointment of absentee ballot clerk.

The governing authority of a municipality shall appoint an absentee ballot clerk who may be the county registrar or any other designated official and who shall perform the duties set forth in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-380.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 32; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 15/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, municipal registrar,” following “county registrar” in the middle of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-2-381.
Making of application for absentee ballot; determination of eligibility by ballot clerk; furnishing of applications to colleges and universities; persons entitled to make application.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 21-2-219 or for advance voting described in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-385, not earlier than 78 days or less than 11 days prior to the date of the primary or election, or runoff of either, in which the elector desires to vote, any absentee elector may make, either by mail, by facsimile transmission, by electronic transmission, or in person in the registrar’s or absentee ballot clerk’s office, an application for an official ballot of the elector’s precinct to be voted at such primary, election, or runoff. To be timely received, an application for an absentee-by-mail ballot shall be received by the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk no later than 11 days prior to the primary, election, or runoff. For advance voting in person, the application shall be made within the time period set forth in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-385.

In the case of an elector residing temporarily out of the county or municipality or a physically disabled elector residing within the county or municipality, the application for the elector’s absentee ballot may, upon satisfactory proof of relationship, be made by such elector’s mother, father, grandparent, aunt, uncle, sister, brother, spouse, son, daughter, niece, nephew, grandchild, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, mother-in-law, father-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law of the age of 18 or over.

Any person applying for an absentee-by-mail ballot shall make application in writing on the form made available by the Secretary of State. In order to confirm the identity of the voter, such form shall require the elector to provide his or her name, date of birth, address as registered, address where the elector wishes the ballot to be mailed, and the number of his or her Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40. If such elector does not have a Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, the elector shall affirm this fact in the manner prescribed in the application and the elector shall provide a copy of a form of identification listed in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417. The form made available by the Secretary of State shall include a space to affix a photocopy or electronic image of such identification. The Secretary of State shall develop a method to allow secure electronic transmission of such form. The application shall also include the identity of the primary, election, or runoff in which the elector wishes to vote; the name and relationship of the person requesting the ballot if other than the elector; and an oath for the elector or relative to write his or her usual signature with a pen and ink affirming that the elector is a qualified Georgia elector and the facts presented on the application are true. Submitting false information on an application for an absentee ballot shall be a violation of Code Sections 21-2-560 and 21-2-571.

A blank application for an absentee ballot shall be made available online by the Secretary of State and each election superintendent and registrar, but neither the Secretary of State, election superintendent, board of registrars, other governmental entity, nor employee or agent thereof shall send absentee ballot applications directly to any elector except upon request of such elector or a relative authorized to request an absentee ballot for such elector. No person or entity other than a relative authorized to request an absentee ballot for such elector or a person signing as assisting an illiterate or physically disabled elector shall send any elector an absentee ballot application that is prefilled with the elector’s required information set forth in this subparagraph. No person or entity other than the elector, a relative authorized to request an absentee ballot for such elector, a person signing as assisting an illiterate or physically disabled elector with his or her application, a common carrier charged with returning the ballot application, an absentee ballot clerk, a registrar, or a law enforcement officer in the course of an investigation shall handle or return an elector’s completed absentee ballot application. Handling a completed absentee ballot application by any person or entity other than as allowed in this subsection shall be a misdemeanor. Any application for an absentee ballot sent to any elector by any person or entity shall utilize the form of the application made available by the Secretary of State and shall clearly and prominently disclose on the face of the form:

“This is NOT an official government publication and was NOT provided to you by any governmental entity and this is NOT a ballot. It is being distributed by [insert name and address of person, organization, or other entity distributing such document or material].”

The disclaimer required by division (ii) of this subparagraph shall be:

Of sufficient font size to be clearly readable by the recipient of the communication;

Be contained in a printed box set apart from the other contents of the communication; and

Be printed with a reasonable degree of color contrast between the background and the printed disclaimer.

Except in the case of physically disabled electors residing in the county or municipality or electors in custody in a jail or other detention facility in the county or municipality, no absentee ballot shall be mailed to an address other than the permanent mailing address of the elector as recorded on the elector’s voter registration record or a temporary out-of-county or out-of-municipality address. Upon request, electors held in jails or other detention facilities who are eligible to vote shall be granted access to the necessary personal effects for the purpose of applying for and voting an absentee ballot pursuant to this chapter.

Relatives applying for absentee ballots for electors must also sign an oath stating that facts in the application are true.

If the elector is unable to fill out or sign such elector’s own application because of illiteracy or physical disability, the elector shall make such elector’s mark, and the person filling in the rest of the application shall sign such person’s name below it as a witness.

Any elector meeting criteria of advance age or disability specified by rule or regulation of the State Election Board or any elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, may request in writing on one application a ballot for a presidential preference primary held pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter and for a primary as well as for any runoffs resulting therefrom and for the election for which such primary shall nominate candidates as well as any runoffs resulting therefrom. If not so requested by such person, a separate and distinct application shall be required for each primary, run-off primary, election, and run-off election. Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, a separate and distinct application for an absentee ballot shall always be required for any special election or special primary.

A properly executed registration card submitted under the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 21-2-219, if submitted within 180 days of a primary or election in which the registrant is entitled to vote, shall be considered to be an application for an absentee ballot under this Code section, or for a special absentee ballot under Code Section 21-2-381.1, as appropriate.

All persons or entities, other than the Secretary of State, election superintendents, boards of registrars, and absentee ballot clerks, that send applications for absentee ballots to electors in a primary, election, or runoff shall mail such applications only to individuals who have not already requested, received, or voted an absentee ballot in the primary, election, or runoff. Any such person or entity shall compare its mail distribution list with the most recent information available about which electors have requested, been issued, or voted an absentee ballot in the primary, election, or runoff and shall remove the names of such electors from its mail distribution list. A person or entity shall not be liable for any violation of this subparagraph if such person or entity relied upon information made available by the Secretary of State within five business days prior to the date such applications are mailed.

A person or entity in violation of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be subject to sanctions by the State Election Board which, in addition to all other possible sanctions, may include requiring such person or entity to pay restitution to each affected county or municipality in an amount up to $100.00 per duplicate absentee ballot application that is processed by the county or municipality due to such violation or the actual cost incurred by each affected county or municipality for the processing of such duplicate absentee ballot applications.

In extraordinary circumstances as described in Code Section 21-2-543.1, the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall determine if the applicants are eligible to vote under this Code section and shall either mail or issue the absentee ballots for the election for representative in the United States Congress to an individual entitled to make application for absentee ballot under subsection (d) of this Code section the same day any such application is received, so long as the application is received by 3:00 P.M., otherwise no later than the next business day following receipt of the application. Any valid absentee ballot shall be accepted and processed so long as the ballot is received by the registrar or absentee ballot clerk not later than 45 days after the ballot is transmitted to the absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter, but in no event later than 11 days following the date of the election.

Upon receipt of a timely application for an absentee ballot, a registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall enter thereon the date received. The registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall verify the identity of the applicant and determine, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, if the applicant is eligible to vote in the primary or election involved. In order to verify the identity of the applicant, the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall compare the applicant’s name, date of birth, and number of his or her Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40 on the application with the information on file in the registrar’s office. If the application does not contain the number of the applicant’s Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall verify that the identification provided with the application identifies the applicant. In order to be found eligible to vote an absentee ballot in person at the registrar’s office or absentee ballot clerk’s office, such person shall show one of the forms of identification listed in Code Section 21-2-417 and the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall compare the identifying information on the application with the information on file in the registrar’s office.

If found eligible, the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall certify by signing in the proper place on the application and then:

Shall mail the ballot as provided in this Code section;

If the application is made in person, shall issue the ballot to the elector within the confines of the registrar’s or absentee ballot clerk’s office as required by Code Section 21-2-383 if the ballot is issued during the advance voting period established pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-385; or

May deliver the ballot in person to the elector if such elector is confined to a hospital.

If found ineligible or if the application is not timely received, the clerk or the board of registrars shall deny the application by writing the reason for rejection in the proper space on the application and shall promptly notify the applicant in writing of the ground of ineligibility, a copy of which notification should be retained on file in the office of the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk for at least one year. However, an absentee ballot application shall not be rejected solely due to a mismatch between the identifying information of the elector on the application and the identifying information of the elector on file with the board of registrars. In such cases, the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall send the elector a provisional absentee ballot with the designation “Provisional Ballot” on the outer oath envelope and information prepared by the Secretary of State as to the process to be followed to cure the discrepancy. If such ballot is returned to the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk prior to the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election, the elector may cure the discrepancy by submitting an affidavit to the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk along with a copy of one of the forms of identification enumerated in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417 before the close of the period for verifying provisional ballots contained in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-419. If the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk finds the affidavit and identification to be sufficient, the absentee ballot shall be counted as other absentee ballots. If the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk finds the affidavit and identification to be insufficient, then the procedure contained in Code Section 21-2-386 shall be followed for rejected absentee ballots.

If the registrar or clerk is unable to determine the identity of the elector from information given on the application or if the application is not complete or if the oath on the application is not signed, the registrar or clerk should promptly contact the elector in writing to request the necessary additional information and a signed copy of the oath.

In the case of an unregistered applicant who is eligible to register to vote, the clerk or the board shall immediately mail a blank registration card as provided by Code Section 21-2-223, and such applicant, if otherwise qualified, shall be deemed eligible to vote by absentee ballot in such primary or election, if the registration card, properly completed, is returned to the clerk or the board on or before the last day for registering to vote in such primary or election.

In those counties or municipalities in which the absentee ballot clerk or board of registrars provides application forms for absentee ballots, the clerk or board shall provide such quantity of the application form to the dean of each college or university located in that county as said dean determines necessary for the students of such college or university.

A citizen of the United States permanently residing outside the United States is entitled to make application for an absentee ballot from Georgia and to vote by absentee ballot in any election for presidential electors and United States senator or representative in Congress:

If such citizen was last domiciled in Georgia immediately before his or her departure from the United States; and

If such citizen could have met all qualifications, except any qualification relating to minimum voting age, to vote in federal elections even though, while residing outside the United States, he or she does not have a place of abode or other address in Georgia.

An individual is entitled to make application for an absentee ballot under paragraph (1) of this subsection even if such individual’s intent to return to Georgia may be uncertain, as long as:

He or she has complied with all applicable Georgia qualifications and requirements which are consistent with 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff concerning absentee registration for and voting by absentee ballots;

He or she does not maintain a domicile, is not registered to vote, and is not voting in any other state or election district of a state or territory or in any territory or possession of the United States; and

He or she has a valid passport or card of identity and registration issued under the authority of the Secretary of State of the United States or, in lieu thereof, an alternative form of identification consistent with 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff and applicable state requirements, if a citizen does not possess a valid passport or card of identity and registration.

The State Election Board is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section. Said rules and regulations may include provisions for the limitation of opportunities for fraudulent application, including, but not limited to, comparison of voter registration records with death certificates.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 186, §§ 3, 6; Code 1933, §§ 34-3302, 34-3305; Ga. L. 1943, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 204, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 732, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1957, p. 39, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1402, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, §§ 18-20; Ga. L. 1974, p. 71, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 550, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 31; Ga. L. 1979, p. 633, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 11; Ga. L. 1985, p. 632, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 932, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 14; Ga. L. 1988, p. 641, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 849, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1742, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1815, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 22; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 649, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 662, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 13; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 33; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 36; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 51/HB 244; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2008, p. 448, §§ 2, 3/SB 387; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 10/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2009, p. 41, § 1/SB 47; Ga. L. 2010, p. 569, § 2/HB 1073; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 18/HB 540; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 10/SB 82; Ga. L. 2011, p. 697, § 1/HB 92; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 16/HB 268; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 27/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 25/SB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subparagraph (a)(1)(G), inserted “a presidential preference primary held pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter and for” near the end of the first sentence, and deleted “for the presidential preference primary held pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter and” following “required” in the middle of the third sentence; and, in subparagraph (b)(2)(B), inserted “on a direct recording electronic (DRE) voting system”, inserted “as required by Code Section 21-2-383”, and inserted “the ballot is” near the middle of the sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, inserted “or electors in custody in a jail or other detention facility in the county or municipality” in the middle of subparagraph (a)(1)(D); deleted “to be voted on a direct recording electronic (DRE) voting system” following “the elector” in the middle of subparagraph (b)(2)(B); and added the second through fifth sentences of paragraph (b)(3).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), substituted “or for advance voting described in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-385, not earlier than 78 days or less than 11 days” for “not more than 180 days” near the beginning and added the last sentence; rewrote subparagraph (a)(1)(C), which read: “The application shall be in writing and shall contain sufficient information for proper identification of the elector; the permanent or temporary address of the elector to which the absentee ballot shall be mailed; the identity of the primary, election, or runoff in which the elector wishes to vote; and the name and relationship of the person requesting the ballot if other than the elector.”; added the last sentence of subparagraph (a)(1)(D); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(3) for “Reserved.”; rewrote paragraph (b)(1), which read: “Upon receipt of a timely application for an absentee ballot, a registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall enter thereon the date received. The registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall determine, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, if the applicant is eligible to vote in the primary or election involved. In order to be found eligible to vote an absentee ballot by mail, the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall compare the identifying information on the application with the information on file in the registrar’s office and, if the application is signed by the elector, compare the signature or mark of the elector on the application with the signature or mark of the elector on the elector’s voter registration card. In order to be found eligible to vote an absentee ballot in person at the registrar’s office or absentee ballot clerk’s office, such person shall show one of the forms of identification listed in Code Section 21-2-417 and the registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall compare the identifying information on the application with the information on file in the registrar’s office.”; in paragraph (b)(3), inserted “or if the application is not timely received” near the beginning, substituted “rejected solely due to a mismatch between the identifying information of the elector on the application and the identifying information” for “rejected due to an apparent mismatch between the signature of the elector on the application and the signature” in the second sentence, and deleted “signature” preceding “discrepancy” at the end of the third sentence and near the middle of the fourth sentence; rewrote paragraph (b)(4), which read: “If the registrar or clerk is unable to determine the identity of the elector from information given on the application, the registrar or clerk should promptly write to request additional information.”; and deleted the former last sentence in paragraph (b)(5), which read: “If the closing date for registration in the primary or election concerned has not passed, the clerk or registrar shall also mail a ballot to the applicant, as soon as it is prepared and available; and the ballot shall be cast in such primary or election if returned to the clerk or board not later than the close of the polls on the day of the primary or election concerned.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-3

, in 2011, the amendment of paragraph (b)(2) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 10/SB 82, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2011, p. 697, § 1/HB 92, due to irreconcilable conflict. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval [April 15, 1994] for the purpose of authorizing the Secretary of State to design and distribute such forms and materials and to develop, procure, and install such computer hardware and software as are required under the provisions of this Act and to exercise such administrative authority as such officer deems necessary and proper for the implementation of this Act. For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective January 1, 1995.”

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Absentee ballot envelope, definition of advanced age, use of symbols, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.01.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-381.1.
Procedures for voting with special write-in absentee ballots by qualified absentee electors.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a qualified absentee elector, as defined in Code Section 21-2-380, in general, special, primary, and run-off elections, who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, and who makes timely application for but does not receive an official absentee ballot may vote by completing, signing, and mailing a federal write-in absentee ballot promulgated under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended.

Any elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, when voting a federal write-in absentee ballot for a federal general, special, or run-off election, may designate a candidate by writing in the name of the candidate or by writing in a party preference for each office. A written designation of the political party shall be counted as a vote for the candidate of that party.

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, may vote in any election for a public office other than for a federal office by using the addendum provided in the federal write-in absentee ballot and writing in the title of the office and the name of the candidate for whom the elector is voting. In a general, special, or run-off election, the elector may alternatively designate a candidate by writing in a party preference for each office, the names of specific candidates for each office, or the name of the person who the elector prefers for each office. A written designation of the political party shall be counted as a vote for the candidate of that party. In addition, such elector may vote on any constitutional amendment or question presented to the electors in such election by identifying the constitutional amendment or question with regard to which such elector desires to vote and specifying the elector’s vote on such amendment or question.

If the elector is voting in a primary or primary runoff, the elector shall identify the political party for which the elector has requested a ballot in the appropriate section of the federal write-in absentee ballot. A vote cast by writing in the name of a candidate who is not affiliated with the identified political party ballot is void and shall not be counted.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a federal write-in absentee ballot shall be submitted and processed in the same manner as provided for official absentee ballots. A federal write-in absentee ballot of any elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, shall not be counted:

In the case of a ballot submitted by an overseas elector who is not an absent uniformed services elector, if the ballot is submitted from any location in the United States;

If the application of an elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, for an absentee ballot is received by the appropriate board of registrars after two days prior to a general, special, primary, or run-off election; or

If an official absentee ballot of an elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, is received by the appropriate board of registrars not later than the deadline for receipt of absentee ballots under subparagraph (a)(1)(G) of Code Section 21-2-386.

The following rules shall apply with respect to federal write-in absentee ballots:

In completing the ballot, an elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, may designate a candidate by writing in the name of the candidate or by writing in the name of a political party, in which case the ballot shall be counted for the candidate of that political party;

In the case of the offices of President and Vice President, a vote for a named candidate or a vote by writing in the name of a political party shall be counted as a vote for the electors supporting the candidate involved; and

Any abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of the candidate or a political party shall be disregarded in determining the validity of the ballot, if the intention of the elector can be ascertained.

Any elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, who submits a federal write-in absentee ballot and later receives an official absentee ballot, may submit the official absentee ballot. An elector who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, who submits a federal write-in absentee ballot and later receives and submits an official absentee ballot should make every reasonable effort to inform the appropriate board of registrars that the elector has submitted more than one ballot.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-381.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 12; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 15; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 569, § 3/HB 1073; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 11/SB 82.